Alabama, session 2026rs, SB165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 11-43B-4, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§11-43B-4
(a) The initial elections provided for herein in this
chapter, and all subsequent elections, shall be conducted, the
vote canvassed, the results declared, and those elected assume
the duties of their offices in the same manner as provided by
the general law of the state pertaining to municipal elections
for mayor-council forms of government, except as otherwise
provided by state statute.
(b)(1) The mayor shall be elected by the whole of the
electors of the city and shall have been a resident of the
city for at least 90 days prior to his or her election.
(2) Council members shall be elected by the electors of
the district which they represent, and shall have been
residents of the district which they represent for at least 90
days prior to their election.
(c)(1) Any person individual desiring to become a
candidate for mayor, or council member, or member of the
Page 1

candidate for mayor, or council member, or member of the
SB165 Enrolled
municipal board of education must, at the time of filing a
statement of candidacy, shall pay to the city clerk the
qualifying fee to be set by ordinance. Notwithstanding Section
11-46-2, the qualifying fee for mayoral candidates shall be
five hundred dollars ($500), and the qualifying fee for
council member and municipal board of education member
candidates shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(2) If any person individual desiring to become a
candidate for mayor, or council member, or member of the
municipal board of education is financially unable to pay the
filing fee, then that person individual shall be exempted from
the fee upon attesting that the individual has a gross income
that does not exceed 130 percent of the federal poverty level
and filing with the city clerk a copy of the individual's most
recent federal tax return.verified statements from three city
electors that said candidate is indigent and not financially
capable of paying the fee.
(d) Within 30 days after the election, every candidate
shall file with the city clerk a sworn statement of all
election campaign expenses and of each person individual,
firm, or corporation which has contributed funds, itemized for
all expenditures and contributions of one hundred dollars
($100.00) or more."
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB165 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB165
Senate 25-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 08-Apr-26




By: Senator Jones
Page 3